Utah statutes.
73-26-106.   Participation of the federal government and other states.

(1)  The division may allow the federal government or the states of Idaho or Wyoming to participate in a project authorized under this chapter for the purpose of developing their water rights.

(2)  Any participating entity shall pay for all project costs represented by its share of the project.



Enacted by Chapter 251, 1991 General Session

